Utah statutes.
53-2a-1010.   Existing agencies to be used in implementation.

The governor shall use, to the extent practicable, existing state boards, commissions, or agencies or officers or employees for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

